Washington statutes.
RCW 11.135.070

Attribution of electronic document or signature—Effect.

(1) An electronic nontestamentary estate planning document or electronic signature on an electronic nontestamentary estate planning document is attributable to a person if it was the act of the person. The act of the person may be shown in any manner, including by showing the efficacy of a security procedure applied to determine the person to which the electronic record or electronic signature was attributable.

(2) The effect of attribution to a person under subsection (1) of this section of a document or signature is determined from the context and surrounding circumstances at the time of its creation, execution, or adoption and as provided by other law.

[ 2024 c 188 s 8.]